Utah statutes.
4-31-116.   Quarantine -- Peace officers to assist in maintenance of quarantine.

(1)  The commissioner may quarantine any infected domestic animal or area within the state to prevent the spread of infectious or contagious disease. 

(2)  A sheriff or other peace officer in the state shall, upon request of the commissioner, assist the department in maintaining a quarantine and arrest a person who violates it.

(3)  The department shall pay all costs and fees incurred by any law enforcement authority in assisting the department.

